Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.08.060

Certificate of authority—Issuance—Contents.

Before any bank shall be authorized to do business, and within ninety days after approval of the articles of incorporation or such other time as the director may allow, it shall furnish proof satisfactory to the director that such corporation has a paid-in capital in the amount determined by the director, that the requisite surplus or reserve fund has been accumulated or paid in cash, and that it has in good faith complied with all the requirements of law and fulfilled all the conditions precedent to commencing business imposed by this title. If so satisfied, and within thirty days after receipt of such proof, the director shall issue under his or her hand and official seal, in triplicate, a certificate of authority for such corporation. The certificate shall state that the corporation therein named has complied with the requirements of law, that it is authorized to transact the business of a bank: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the director may make his or her issuance of the certificate to a bank authorized to accept deposits, conditional upon the granting of deposit insurance by the federal deposit insurance corporation, and in such event, shall set out such condition in a written notice which shall be delivered to the corporation.

One of the triplicate certificates shall be transmitted by the director to the corporation and one of the other two shall be filed by the director in the office of the secretary of state and shall be attached to the articles of incorporation: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That if the issuance of the certificate is made conditional upon the granting of deposit insurance by the federal deposit insurance corporation, the director shall not transmit or file the certificate until such condition is satisfied.

[ 2014 c 37 s 155; 1994 c 92 s 47; 1986 c 279 s 20; 1981 c 302 s 17; 1973 1st ex.s. c 104 s 7; 1955 c 33 s 30.08.060. Prior: 1929 c 72 s 3, part; 1923 c 115 s 5, part; 1917 c 80 s 22, part; RRS s 3229, part. Formerly RCW 30.08.060.]

NOTES:

Severability—1981 c 302: See note following RCW 19.76.100.